src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
  LEXICON x_22_s_NOT_Por
    +Sg      :^WGs           nom_end           ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste
    +Sg      :^WGs           nom_R             ; !! * Konsonanttivartalo: poista -e ja heikko aste

    +Pl      :e              nom_t             ;
    +Sg      :e              gen_n_sg          ;
    +Sg      :%>t            par_tA            ;
    +Sg      :te^HMETA       ill_hVVn          ;
    +Sg      :te             ess_nnA           ;
    +Sg      :e              sgpl_cases_odd    ;

    +Pl      :ks%>i2         gen_tten          ; ! maybe add ksi and remove i2
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         par_A             ;
    +Pl      :ks^HMETA       ill_hiin          ;
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         ess_nnA           ;
    +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2         com_nne           ;
    +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2         com_ne            ;
    +Pl      :ks%>i2         sgpl_cases_odd    ; ! TODO wtf is this comm --> hmm, tämä menee pieleen, sg ≠ pl


! LEXICON vanha_n_32s != @CODE@  sairhaus vanha versio
!        +N:t              long_par          ;
!        +N:te             obl_strong        ;
!        +N:te^WG          weak_v_stem       ;
!     +N+Sg:^WG            sgpl_cases_odd    ;
!     +N+Pl:^WG%>i2        sgpl_cases_odd    ;
!     +N+Pl:ks%>i2         par_V             ;
!     +N+Pl:ks%>i2         gen_Vn            ;
!     +N+Pl:ks%>i2         horterillpl      ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_32t
                           !n_32             ; ! ei tehty

!LEXICON vanha_n_33 ! ei tehty
                           !n_33s            ;

LEXICON n_32_as !!= @CODE@ rakas, asukas
+N         : x_32_as ;

LEXICON x_32_as
  +Sg+Nom:a^WG%>s      K                 ;
  +Sg      :a^WG%>s      par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :haa          ill_sseen         ;
!      +Pl+Ill:h%>aissiin   K                 ;
  +Sg      :h%>aa        gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :h%>aa        ess_nA             ;
  +Sg      :h%>aa        sgpl_cases_even   ;

  +Pl      :h%>aa        nom_t             ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     gen_tten          ; ! asukkhaitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:h%>a%>je     gen_n             ; ! rakkhajen
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     par_tA            ; ! asukkhaita
  +Pl+Dial/Var:h%>a%>j      par_A             ; ! rakkhaja
  ! +N+Pl+Ess:h%>a%>i2%>na PxxK              ;
  +Pl      :h%>ai        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl      :h%>aa%>i2    ess_nA             ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl      :h%>a%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_33aes
!        +N:             vanha_x_33aes           ;

LEXICON n_32_aes
+N         : x_32_aes ;

LEXICON x_32_aes
  +Sg+Nom:ä^WG%>s      K                 ;
  +Sg      :ä^WG%>s      par_tA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg      :hää          ill_sseen         ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        ess_nA            ;
  +Sg      :h%>ää        sgpl_cases_even   ;
    !    +Pl+Ill:h%>äissiin   K                 ;

  +Pl      :h%>ää        nom_t             ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     gen_tten          ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     par_tA            ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hä%>je       gen_n             ; ! sinnikkhäjen
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hä%>j        par_A             ; ! sinnikkhäjä
  +Pl      :h%>äi        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     ess_nA            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ää%>i2    ess_nA            ; ! TODO choose one
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl      :h%>ä%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;



!LEXICON vanha_n_33ys !!= @CODE@ rakas
!        +N:        vanha_x_33ys ;
! +N+Sg+Nom:%>y^WGs R      ;



LEXICON n_32_is !!= @CODE@ ruvis, ruumis
+N+Dial/Por:^Por x_32_is ;
+N+Dial/Var:^Var x_32_is ;
+N+Dial/Jok:^Jok x_32_is ;

LEXICON x_32_is ! kaunis
  +Sg      :i^WG%>s   nom_end         ;
  +Sg      :hii       gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :i^WG%>s   par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :%>hii     ill_sseen       ;
  +Sg      :hii       ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :hii       sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl      :hii       nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :hii       gen_tten        ; ! rukkhiitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hi%>je    gen_n           ; ! rukhijen
  +Pl      :hii       par_tA          ; ! rukkhiita
  +Pl+Dial/Var:hi%>j     par_A           ; ! rukhija
  +Pl      :hii       ill_ssiin       ;
  +Pl      :%>hii     ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :h%>i2i    com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :h%>ii     sgpl_cases_even ;

!LEXICON vanha_n_33  !!= @CODE@ odottaessa viitataan n_33t-hen
!  n_33t ;

LEXICON n_32_et !!= @CODE@ venet, hyljet, huonet
+N         :   x_32_et ;

LEXICON x_32_et
  +Sg+Dial/Var+Nom:e^WG     K              ;
  +Sg+Dial/-Var:e^WG        nom_t          ;
  +Sg      :e^WG%>t     par_tA         ;

  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>je      gen_n          ; ! venhejen
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>j       par_A          ; ! venhejä
  +Pl      :hee%>i2     com_ne         ;

           :hee         x_32_et_ts_common ;

LEXICON n_32_ts !!= @CODE@ kirves
+N         :   x_32_ts ;
+N+Sg      :es nom_R      ;

LEXICON x_32_ts !!= @CODE@ kirves
  +Sg:es          nom_end              ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:he%>je      gen_n          ; ! Kirvhejen
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:he%>j       par_A          ; ! Kirvhejä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>je      gen_n          ; ! Kirvhejen
  +Pl+Dial/Var:he%>j       par_A          ; ! Kirvhejä
  +Sg      :es          par_tA         ;
  +Pl      :hee%>i2     com_ne         ;

           :hee         x_32_et_ts_common ;
             !      +Pl+Gen:hee%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! Can this be commented out? yes, is in the common

LEXICON x_32_et_ts_common
  +Sg      :         gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :         ill_sseen       ;
  +Sg      :         ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :         sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :         nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     ill_ssiin       ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2     sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
      ! +Pl+Ill:heissiin K               ;


LEXICON n_22_excns !!= * @CODE@ = veres (keskus)
+N         :           x_22_excns     ;
+N+Sg      :s          nom_R          ;
!+N+Sg      :kse        gen_n_sg       ;

LEXICON x_22_excns
  +Sg      :^WG%>s     nom_end        ;
  +Sg      :kse        gen_n_sg       ;
  +Sg      :%>s        par_tA         ;
  +Sg      :ks         ill_heen       ;
!  +Sg      :ks         ill_hVVn       ;
!  +Sg+Ill:ksheen K              ; ! +Pl+Ill:ksh%>i2in K; ! TODO TODO TODO
  +Sg      :kse        ess_nnA        ;
  +Sg      :kse        sgpl_cases_odd ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :kse        nom_t          ;
  +Pl      :%>s        gen_ten        ; ! veresten
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! vereksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     gen_tten       ; ! vereksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2     par_V          ; ! vereksii
  +Pl+Dial/Por:ks%>i2i    par_tA         ; ! vereksiitä
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:ks%>i2     par_A          ; ! vereksiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:ks%>i2     par_A          ; ! vereksiä
  +Pl      :ks         ill_hiin       ; ! ei ^HMETA? tai edel tai mitään?
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    ess_nnA        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:kse%>i2    com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:kse%>i2    com_nne        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:kse%>i2    com_ne         ;
  +Pl      :kse%>i2    sgpl_cases_odd ; ! the same affix in sg and pl -- tsekkaa long
 ! +Pl+Par:%>ksii     K              ;
 
 LEXICON n_22_excns_even !!= * @CODE@ = (kuttumus)
+N         :           x_22_excns_even     ;
+N+Sg      :s          nom_R          ;
!+N+Sg      :kse        gen_n_sg       ;
