src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
suittet:suitt2 n_32_et ;
juhanes:juhane n_22_excns ;
ilves:ilve n_22_excns ;
vaihet:vaih n_32_et ;
puhet:puh n_32_et ;
jänis:jäni n_22_excns ;
kauppias:kauppi n_32_as ;
lajet:laj n_32_et ;
purjet:purj n_32_et ;
rajet:rak n_32_et ;
maksovehjet:makso#vehk n_32_et ;
vehjet:vehk n_32_et ;
rakas:rakk n_32_as ;
lapikas:lapikk n_32_as ;
kallokas:kallokk n_32_as ;
ehđokas:ehđokk n_32_as ;
asukas:asukk n_32_as ;
aapahyljet:aapa#hylk n_32_et ;
hyljet:hylk n_32_et ;
kangas:kank n_32_as ;
kannas:kank n_32_as ;
nokkarengas:nokka#renk n_32_as ;
korvarengas:korva#renk n_32_as ;
rengas:renk n_32_as ;
kuningas:kunink n_32_as ;
varas:vark n_32_as ;
kiuvas:kiuk n_32_as ;
ruvis:ruk n_32_is ;
taipalet:taipal n_32_et ;
sirpalet:sirpal n_32_et ;
saitavalas:saita#val n_32_as ;
valas:val n_32_as ;
keläs:kel n_32_aes ;
perkelet:perkel n_32_et ;
kantelet:kantel n_32_et ;
sapilas:sapil n_32_as ;
alushamet:alus#ham n_32_et ;
homet:hom n_32_et ;
armas:arm n_32_as ; !!! TODO toimiiko astevaihtelu?
ruumis:ruum n_32_is ;
räämet:rääm n_32_et ;
muttuurivenet+Err/Orth:moottori#ven n_32_et ; 
järvivenet:järvi#ven n_32_et ;
venet:ven n_32_et ;
raaka-ainet:raaka-#ain n_32_et ;
käännet:käänt2 n_32_et ;
oopperahuonet:ooppera#huon n_32_et ;
raatihuonet:raati#huon n_32_et ;
vierashuonet:vieras#huon n_32_et ;
kokkoushuonet:kokkous#huon n_32_et ;
huonet:huon n_32_et ;
munas:mun n_32_as ;
lounas:loun n_32_as ;
eepos:eep2o n_22_excns ;
liitos:liit2o n_22_excns ;
hiilos:hiilo n_22_excns ;
kinos:kino n_22_excns ;
pistos:pisto n_22_excns ;
helvet:help n_32_et ;
maitohammas:maito#hamp n_32_as ;
ostohammas:osto#hamp n_32_as ;
etuhammas:etu#hamp n_32_as ;
hammas:hamp n_32_as ;
paivunlammas:paijun#lamp n_32_as ;
paivunlammas:paivun#lamp n_32_as ;
nahkasaapas:nahka#saapp n_32_as ;
saapas:saapp n_32_as ;
opas:opp n_32_as ;
tarvet:tarp n_32_et ;
naaras:naar n_32_as ;
viinitaras:viini#tar n_32_as ;
elläintaras:elläin#tar n_32_as ;
hetelmätaras:hetelmä#tar n_32_as ;
taras:tar n_32_as ;
fiskariperet:fiskari#per n_32_et ;
koiras:koir n_32_as ;
muret:mur n_32_et ;
hykset:hyks n_32_et ;
katajanpensas:katajan#pens n_32_as ;
porsas:pors n_32_as ;
siikatet:siikat n_32_et ;
kaatosađet:kaato#sat n_32_et ;
kielitieđet:kieli#tiet n_32_et ; ! XXX check
tehđas:teht n_32_as ;
kengänvoiđet:kengän#voit n_32_et ;
siđet:sit n_32_et ;
suola-allas:suola-#alt n_32_as ;
dreneerinkiallas:dreneerinki#alt n_32_as ;
suolavesiallas:suola#vesi#alt n_32_as ;
mallas:malt n_32_as ;
pallas:palt n_32_as ;
vannet:vant n_32_et ;
lapsenvuođet:lapsen#vuot n_32_et ;
parras:part n_32_as ;
porras:port n_32_as ;
muret:murt n_32_et ;
rastas:rast n_32_as ;
estet:est n_32_et ;
paistet:paist n_32_et ;
heluntaikuostet:heluntai#kuost n_32_et ;
roustet:roust n_32_et ;
ruoholaatas:ruoho#laatt n_32_as ;
alusvaatet:alus#vaatt n_32_et ;
vaatet:vaatt n_32_et ;
ratas:ratt n_32_as ;
lietet:liett n_32_et ; !!! TODO käänteinen astevaihtelu
kortet:kortt n_32_et ;
puđas:put n_32_as ;
hyđet:hyt n_32_et ;
ajatus:ajat2u n_22_excns ;
status:stat2u n_22_excns ;
vaihetus:vaihet2u n_22_excns ;
opetus:opet2u n_22_excns ;
pummitus:pummit2u n_22_excns ;
allekirjoitus:alle#kirjoit2u n_22_excns ;
kirjoitus:kirjoit2u n_22_excns ;
tarkoitus:tarkoit2u n_22_excns ;
ehđoitus:ehđoit2u n_22_excns ;
rajotus:rajot2u n_22_excns ;
sekotus:sekot2u n_22_excns ;
helpotus:helpot2u n_22_excns ;
verotus:verot2u n_22_excns ;
ođotus:ođot2u n_22_excns ;
koulutus:koulut2u n_22_excns ;
muistutus:muistut2u n_22_excns ;
vatkaus:vatkau n_22_excns ; 
julistus:julist2u n_22_excns_even ; 
pakkaus:pakkau n_22_excns ;
tappaus:tappau n_22_excns ;
defineeraus:defineerau n_22_excns ;
alaslastaus:alas#lastau n_22_excns_even ;
hunteeraus:hunteerau n_22_excns ;   
kuvvaus:kuvvau n_22_excns ;
alus:alu n_22_excns ;
etukäsimuistelus:etu#käsi#muistelu n_22_excns ;
arvelus:arvelu n_22_excns ;
kuttumus:kuttumu n_22_excns_even ;
tutkimus:tutkimu n_22_excns ;
juomus:juomu n_22_excns ;
kustanus:kustanu n_22_excns ;
komenus:komenu n_22_excns ;
loppurukkous:loppu#rukkou n_22_excns ;
rangastus:rangastu n_22_excns ;
aivastus:aivastu n_22_excns ;
tođistus:tođistu n_22_excns ;
tunnustus:tunnustu n_22_excns ;
kylissitavus+Err/Orth:kulissi#tavu n_22_excns ; 
taivas:taiv n_32_as ;
kalvet:kalv n_32_et ;
kirves:kirv n_32_ts ;
nimitys:nimit2y n_22_excns ;
käsitys:käsit2y n_22_excns ;
herätys:herät2y n_22_excns ;
pyrnys:pyrny n_22_excns ;
käristys:käristy n_22_excns ;
räknäys:räknäy n_22_excns ;
teräs:terä n_22_excns ;
